Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska45-914
Change in control of licensee; approval required.

The prior written approval of the director shall be required whenever a change in control of a licensee is proposed. Control in the case of a corporation shall mean (1) direct or indirect ownership or the right to control ten percent or more of the voting shares of the corporation or (2) the ability of a person or group acting in concert to elect a majority of the directors or otherwise effect a change in policy. Control in the case of any other entity shall mean any change in the principals of the organization, whether active or passive. The director may require such information as he or she deems necessary to determine whether a new application is required. Costs incurred by the director in investigating a change of control request shall be paid by the person or persons requesting such approval.

Laws 1994, LB 967, § 14.